Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
Cross references.

Criminal penalty for livestock theft, §

16-8-20

.

Appointment of director of agricultural matters by board of regents, §

20-3-73

.

Conducting of farmers’ institutes by board of regents, §

20-10-1

.

Sale of farm tractors, §

40-4-45

.

Provision that agricultural or farming operations, places, establishments, or facilities shall not become a nuisance as result of changed conditions in vicinity of such operations, places, establishments, or facilities, §

41-1-7

.

Exemption of agricultural products and machinery from sales and use taxes, §§

48-8-3

through

48-8-5

.

Editor’s notes.

By resolution (Ga. L. 1994, p. 1219), the General Assembly created the GA 96 AG Joint Steering Committee to guide the involvement of the agricultural industry in activities for and surrounding the 1996 Centennial Olympic Games, which committee was abolished on December 31, 1994.